Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB950.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Companion Animal Cremation Consumer Protection Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Animal." A deceased animal that had a companion or pet relationship with its owner at the time of the animal's death."Cremated remains." The material remaining after the cremation of an animal, which may include bone fragments and residue resulting from the cremation process, and which may be 123456789101112131415161718 pulverized or otherwise processed by the cremation provider."Funeral director." A licensed funeral director as defined in 49 Pa. Code § 13.1 (relating to definitions)."Holding facility." An area designated for the retention of animal remains prior to cremation that meets the standards under section 6."Pet shop." A person or facility that offers animals for sale on a retail basis to be kept as household companions or pets."Provider." A person or entity that engages in the business of cremating deceased animals in this Commonwealth."Veterinarian." An individual licensed to practice veterinary medicine and surgery under the laws of this Commonwealth or another state.Section 3. Disclosure of cremation services.(a) Description.--A provider shall furnish a written description of available cremation services, without charge, to each of the following:(1) The owner of a deceased animal, or another person acting on the owner's behalf, who arranges for cremation services.(2) A veterinarian, pet shop, funeral director or other person who refers animal owners or delivers deceased animals to the provider more than five times in a calendar year.(3) The Department of Agriculture.(4) Any other person upon request.(b) Form and content.--The written description of services shall:(1) be provided in printed form, such as a brochure;(2) be available in quantities sufficient to allow for 20250SB0950PN1071 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 distribution to animal owners referred or served by the provider; and(3) contain a detailed and clear explanation of each cremation service offered.(c) Prohibited content.--The written description of services may not contain information that is unclear or misleading. A description is misleading if the description:(1) fails to include a complete and accurate explanation of each cremation service or omits a required disclosure under this act; or(2) includes text, illustrations, layout or formatting that causes confusion about the nature of the services or obstructs important disclosures.Section 4. Distribution and certification.(a) Distribution by intermediaries.--A veterinarian, pet shop, funeral director or other person who refers animal owners or accepts deceased animals for cremation more than five times in a calendar year shall provide a copy of the provider's written description of services to the animal owner, or to a person acting on the owner's behalf, at the time of referral or acceptance.(b) Timing of distribution.--A copy of the provider's written description of services shall be given to the animal owner, or to a person acting on the owner's behalf, at the time cremation services are authorized.(c) Certification by provider.--If cremation services include the return of cremated remains, the provider shall include with the returned cremated remains a certification stating that, to the best of the provider's knowledge and belief, and except as otherwise indicated on the certificate, 20250SB0950PN1071 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the cremation and related services were performed in accordance with the provider's written description of services.(d) Certification by intermediary.--If a veterinarian, pet shop, funeral director or other person is responsible for returning cremated remains to the animal owner, the veterinarian, pet shop, funeral director or other person shall provide all of the following:(1) The provider's certification under subsection (c).(2) A second certification stating that, to the best of the intermediary's knowledge and belief, and except as otherwise indicated on the certificate, the returned remains are those of the animal owner's deceased animal and were returned in accordance with the provider's representations.(e) Reliance on documentation.--A veterinarian, pet shop, funeral director or other person subject to subsection (d) may rely in good faith on the documentation and representations provided by the provider and is not required to observe the cremation process.Section 5. Required notices.(a) Written notice of rights.--At the time the written description of services is provided under section 3 or 4, the provider or intermediary shall furnish to the animal owner, or to a person acting on the owner's behalf, a written notice specifying the rights provided under this act. The notice shall include the following statement, presented in a clear and conspicuous manner:THIS DISCLOSURE OF RIGHTS IS A SUMMARY OF PENNSYLVANIA LAW. THE ACTUAL PROVISIONS OF THE LAW ARE SET FORTH IN THE COMPANION ANIMAL CREMATION CONSUMER PROTECTION ACT.(b) Posted summary.--A summary of the provisions of this act 20250SB0950PN1071 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be conspicuously posted at each place of business of a provider, veterinarian, pet shop, funeral director or other person subject to this act. The summary shall also state that the provider's written description of services is available upon request.(c) Mandatory disclosures.--The written description of services provided under section 3 or 4 shall include all of the following:(1) A clear explanation of each cremation option offered, including the following:(i) Private cremation explained as the cremation of a single animal in a clean, empty chamber, with the cremated remains returned exclusively to the owner.(ii) Individual-partitioned cremation explained as the cremation of multiple animals in the same chamber using physical barriers or designated spaces to maintain separation, with cremated remains returned to each owner.(iii) Communal cremation explained as the cremation of multiple animals simultaneously in a single chamber without separation. No cremated remains are returned to the owner.(2) The date the cremation was completed.(3) A statement that the cremation was conducted in accordance with prevailing industry standards or best practices and in compliance with applicable Federal and State public health laws.Section 6. Holding facility standards.(a) Duty of providers.--A provider shall ensure that a holding facility used to retain the remains of animals prior to cremation complies with the standards specified under subsection 20250SB0950PN1071 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b).(b) Standards.--A holding facility shall meet all of the following standards:(1) Protect the health of personnel responsible for handling animal remains and comply with applicable Federal and State public health laws.(2) Preserve the dignity of the animal remains.Section 7. Recordkeeping requirements.(a) Records required.--A provider shall maintain complete and accurate records for each cremation performed. The records shall be retained for a period of not less than five years and shall include all of the following:(1) A cremation authorization form signed by the animal owner or by a person authorized to act on the owner's behalf.(2) Identification records, including tags, labels or tracking documentation used to identify the cremated remains.(3) A cremation service log documenting the date of cremation, the method of cremation and the name of the operator or entity that performed the cremation.(b) Confidentiality.--A provider shall implement and maintain reasonable procedures to ensure the confidentiality and security of client records, including personally identifying information related to the animal owner or the deceased animal.Section 8. Enforcement and penalties.(a) Authority of Attorney General.--A violation of this act shall constitute a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. The Office of Attorney General shall have all powers and duties under that act necessary to enforce this act.20250SB0950PN1071 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Prohibited conduct.--A person may not engage in any of the following:(1) Prepare or distribute a written description of services that the person knows or reasonably should know is false, misleading or otherwise not in compliance with this act.(2) Intentionally fail to provide a written description of services, notice of rights or certification as required under this act.(3) Knowingly make a false certification under section 4.(4) Violate the holding facility standards under section 6.(5) Fail to maintain or secure records as required under section 7.(c) Licensure consequences.--If a person required to be licensed or certified by a Commonwealth agency commits a violation of this act, the appropriate licensing board or licensing commission or regulatory authority may suspend, revoke or impose conditions on the person's license or certification, in accordance with applicable State law.(d) Written warning.--The Office of Attorney General may issue a written warning letter to any person engaged in a violation of this act.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0950PN1071 - 7 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526